third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/bg_BG.aff
SFX R Y 160
SFX R   ера       ерат      ера
SFX R   ера       ере       ера
SFX R   ера       ерейки    ера
SFX R   ера       ерели     ера
SFX R   ера       ерелите   ера
SFX R   ера       ерем      ера
SFX R   ера       ерете     ера
SFX R   ера       ереш      ера
SFX R   ера       ереше     ера
SFX R   ера       ерещи     ера
SFX R   ера       ерещите   ера
SFX R   ера       ери       ера
SFX R   ера       ерял      ера
SFX R   ера       еряла     ера
SFX R   ера       ерялата   ера
SFX R   ера       ерялия    ера
SFX R   ера       ерялият   ера
SFX R   ера       еряло     ера
SFX R   ера       ерялото   ера
SFX R   ера       ерях      ера
SFX R   ера       еряха     ера
SFX R   ера       еряхме    ера
SFX R   ера       еряхте    ера
SFX R   ера       ерящ      ера
SFX R   ера       еряща     ера
SFX R   ера       ерящата   ера
SFX R   ера       ерящия    ера
SFX R   ера       ерящият   ера
SFX R   ера       ерящо     ера
SFX R   ера       ерящото   ера
SFX R   ера       ра        ера
SFX R   ера       рал       ера
SFX R   ера       рала      ера
SFX R   ера       ралата    ера
SFX R   ера       рали      ера
SFX R   ера       ралите    ера
SFX R   ера       ралия     ера
SFX R   ера       ралият    ера
SFX R   ера       рало      ера
SFX R   ера       ралото    ера
SFX R   ера       ран       ера
SFX R   ера       рана      ера
SFX R   ера       раната    ера
SFX R   ера       рани      ера
SFX R   ера       раните    ера
SFX R   ера       рания     ера
SFX R   ера       раният    ера
SFX R   ера       рано      ера
SFX R   ера       раното    ера
SFX R   ера       рах       ера
SFX R   ера       раха      ера
SFX R   ера       рахме     ера
SFX R   ера       рахте     ера
SFX R   ея        ее        ея
SFX R   ея        еейки     ея
SFX R   ея        еел       ея
SFX R   ея        еела      ея
SFX R   ея        еелата    ея
SFX R   ея        еели      ея
SFX R   ея        еелите    ея
SFX R   ея        еелия     ея
SFX R   ея        еелият    ея
SFX R   ея        еело      ея
SFX R   ея        еелото    ея
SFX R   ея        еем       ея
SFX R   ея        еете      ея
SFX R   ея        еех       ея
SFX R   ея        ееха      ея
SFX R   ея        еехме     ея
SFX R   ея        еехте     ея
SFX R   ея        ееш       ея
SFX R   ея        ееше      ея
SFX R   ея        еещ       ея
SFX R   ея        ееща      ея
SFX R   ея        еещата    ея
SFX R   ея        еещи      ея
SFX R   ея        еещите    ея
SFX R   ея        еещия     ея
SFX R   ея        еещият    ея
SFX R   ея        еещо      ея
SFX R   ея        еещото    ея
SFX R   ея        ей        ея
SFX R   ея        ейте      ея
SFX R   ея        ели       ея
SFX R   ея        елите     ея
SFX R   ея        елия      ея
SFX R   ея        елият     ея
SFX R   ея        ени       ея
SFX R   ея        ените     ея
SFX R   ея        еят       ея
SFX R   ея        я         ея
SFX R   ея        ял        ея
SFX R   ея        яла       ея
SFX R   ея        ялата     ея
SFX R   ея        яло       ея
SFX R   ея        ялото     ея
SFX R   ея        ян        ея
SFX R   ея        яна       ея
SFX R   ея        яната     ея
SFX R   ея        яния      ея
SFX R   ея        яният     ея
SFX R   ея        яно       ея
SFX R   ея        яното     ея
SFX R   ея        ях        ея
SFX R   ея        яха       ея
SFX R   ея        яхме      ея
SFX R   ея        яхте      ея
SFX R   ша        са        ша
SFX R   ша        сал       ша
SFX R   ша        сала      ша
SFX R   ша        салата    ша
SFX R   ша        сали      ша
SFX R   ша        салите    ша
SFX R   ша        салия     ша
SFX R   ша        салият    ша
SFX R   ша        сало      ша
SFX R   ша        салото    ша
SFX R   ша        сан       ша
SFX R   ша        сана      ша
SFX R   ша        саната    ша
SFX R   ша        сани      ша
SFX R   ша        саните    ша
SFX R   ша        сания     ша
SFX R   ша        саният    ша
SFX R   ша        сано      ша
SFX R   ша        саното    ша
SFX R   ша        сах       ша
SFX R   ша        саха      ша
SFX R   ша        сахме     ша
SFX R   ша        сахте     ша
SFX R   ша        шат       ша
SFX R   ша        ше        ша
SFX R   ша        шейки     ша
SFX R   ша        шел       ша
SFX R   ша        шела      ша
SFX R   ша        шелата    ша
SFX R   ша        шели      ша
SFX R   ша        шелите    ша
SFX R   ша        шелия     ша
SFX R   ша        шелият    ша
SFX R   ша        шело      ша
SFX R   ша        шелото    ша
SFX R   ша        шем       ша
SFX R   ша        шете      ша
SFX R   ша        шех       ша
SFX R   ша        шеха      ша
SFX R   ша        шехме     ша
SFX R   ша        шехте     ша
SFX R   ша        шеш       ша
SFX R   ша        шеше      ша
SFX R   ша        шещ       ша
SFX R   ша        шеща      ша
SFX R   ша        шещата    ша
SFX R   ша        шещи      ша
SFX R   ша        шещите    ша
SFX R   ша        шещия     ша
SFX R   ша        шещият    ша
SFX R   ша        шещо      ша
SFX R   ша        шещото    ша
SFX R   ша        ши        ша

SFX S Y 81
SFX S   ам        а         ам
SFX S   ам        ай        ам
SFX S   ам        айки      ам
SFX S   ам        айте      ам
SFX S   ам        ал        ам
SFX S   ам        ала       ам
SFX S   ам        алата     ам
SFX S   ам        али       ам
SFX S   ам        алите     ам
SFX S   ам        алия      ам
SFX S   ам        алият     ам
SFX S   ам        ало       ам
SFX S   ам        алото     ам
SFX S   ам        аме       ам
SFX S   ам        ан        ам
SFX S   ам        ана       ам
SFX S   ам        аната     ам
SFX S   ам        ани       ам
SFX S   ам        аните     ам
SFX S   ам        ания      ам
SFX S   ам        аният     ам
SFX S   ам        ано       ам
SFX S   ам        аното     ам
SFX S   ам        ат        ам
SFX S   ам        ате       ам
SFX S   ам        ах        ам
SFX S   ам        аха       ам
SFX S   ам        ахме      ам
SFX S   ам        ахте      ам
SFX S   ам        аш        ам
SFX S   ам        аше       ам
SFX S   ам        ащ        ам
SFX S   ам        аща       ам
SFX S   ам        ащата     ам
SFX S   ам        ащи       ам
SFX S   ам        ащите     ам
SFX S   ам        ащия      ам
SFX S   ам        ащият     ам
SFX S   ам        ащо       ам
SFX S   ам        ащото     ам
SFX S   я         ейки      я
SFX S   я         ели       я
SFX S   я         елите     я
SFX S   я         елия      я
SFX S   я         елият     я
SFX S   я         ени       я
SFX S   я         ените     я
SFX S   я         ете       я
SFX S   я         еше       я
SFX S   я         и         я
SFX S   я         им        я
SFX S   я         ите       я
SFX S   я         иш        я
SFX S   я         ял        я
SFX S   я         яла       я
SFX S   я         ялата     я
SFX S   я         ялия      я
SFX S   я         ялият     я
SFX S   я         яло       я
SFX S   я         ялото     я
SFX S   я         ян        я
SFX S   я         яна       я
SFX S   я         яната     я
SFX S   я         яния      я
SFX S   я         яният     я
SFX S   я         яно       я
SFX S   я         яното     я
SFX S   я         ят        я
SFX S   я         ях        я
SFX S   я         яха       я
SFX S   я         яхме      я
SFX S   я         яхте      я
SFX S   я         ящ        я
SFX S   я         яща       я
SFX S   я         ящата     я
SFX S   я         ящи       я
SFX S   я         ящите     я
SFX S   я         ящия      я
SFX S   я         ящият     я
SFX S   я         ящо       я
SFX S   я         ящото     я
